Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1816
Jurisdictional utility; ownership of competitor; prohibited; when.

No jurisdictional utility shall purchase or acquire, take, or hold any part of the voting stock, bonds, or other forms of indebtedness of any competing jurisdictional utility, either as owner or pledgee, unless authorized by the commission.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 16.